Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 70. HEADS OF DEPARTMENTS

CHAPTER 9. COMMISSIONS AND AGENCIES

Art. 4413(47e-1). SUPERCONDUCTING SUPER COLLIDER FACILITY; ACTIVITIES NEAR SITE.

Sec. 1. DEFINITIONS. In this Act:

(1) "Interaction region of the super collider" means an area above, below, or adjacent to a tunnel or other improvement used in any way with the super collider or an area designated by the United States Department of Energy as an interaction region of the super collider.

(2) "Super collider" means the superconducting super collider scientific project constructed and operated in Ellis County.

Sec. 2. PROHIBITED ACTIVITIES. A person may not conduct blasting, rock quarry operations, or another activity that causes ground motion in excess of one micron in frequencies of five hertz or less as measured at an interaction region of the super collider.

Sec. 3. INJUNCTION. The United States Department of Energy may bring an action to enjoin a violation of this Act.

Sec. 4. PENALTIES. (a) A person who violates this Act commits an offense.

(b) An offense under this section is punishable by a fine of not less than $100 or more than $1,000, confinement in jail for not more than one year, or both.

Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 281, Sec. 1 to 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.